Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-225
Fire department; establishment; government.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to provide for the organization of a fire department, to procure fire engines, hooks, ladders, buckets, and other apparatus, to organize fire engine, hook, ladder, and bucket companies, to prescribe rules of duty and the government of the fire department, with such penalties as the city council may deem proper, not exceeding a one-hundred-dollar fine, to make all necessary appropriations therefor, and to establish regulations for the prevention and extinguishment of fires.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXIX, p. 134;

Laws 1907, c. 9, § 13, p. 84;

Laws 1913, c. 7, § 1, p. 65;

R.S.1913, § 4439;

C.S.1922, § 3823;

C.S.1929, § 15-226;

R.S.1943, § 15-225;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 42.